apertium-msa.msa.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Malay

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>   ! Noun
%<v%>   ! Verb
%<adj%> ! Adjective
%<pr%> ! Preposition

! Number morphology
%<pl%>  ! Plural
%<sg%>  ! Singular

! Other symbols
%>      ! Morpheme boundary


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Nouns;

Verbs;

Adjectives;

Prepositions;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON N1

%<n%>%<sg%>:  # ;

LEXICON V

%<v%>: # ;

LEXICON ADJ

%<adj%>: # ;

LEXICON PR

%<pr%>: # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!=============!
 LEXICON Nouns
!=============!

abad:abad N1 ; ! "century"
abang:abang N1 ; ! "brother"
air:air N1 ; ! "water"
anak:anak N1 ; ! "child"
api:api N1 ; ! "fire"
ayah:ayah N1 ; ! "father"
ayam:ayam N1 ; ! "chicken"
baba:baba N1 ; ! "father"
babak:babak N1 ; ! "chapter"
badan:badan N1 ; ! "body"
bahasa:bahasa N1 ; ! "language"
bahu:bahu N1 ; ! "shoulder"
balik:balik N1 ; ! "back"
bandar:bandar N1 ; ! "town"
bang:bang N1 ; ! "brother"
bangku:bangku N1 ; ! "bench"
belakang:belakang N1 ; ! "back"
bibir:bibir N1 ; ! "lip"
buku:buku N1 ; ! "book"
bulan:bulan N1 ; ! "month"
cakerawala:cakerawala N1 ; ! "planet"
calon:calon N1 ; ! "candidate"
cawan:cawan N1 ; ! "cup"
dada:dada N1 ; ! "chest"
daging:daging N1 ; ! "meat"
dagu:dagu N1 ; ! "chin"
diri:diri N1 ; ! "self"
dunia:dunia N1 ; ! "world"
epal:epal N1 ; ! "apple"
gadis:gadis N1 ; ! "girl"
gigi:gigi N1 ; ! "tooth"
hati:hati N1 ; ! "heart"
hidung:hidung N1 ; ! "nose"
hidup:hidup N1 ; ! "life"
ibu:ibu N1 ; ! "mother"
ikan:ikan N1 ; ! "fish"
jalan:jalan N1 ; ! "street"
jam:jam N1 ; ! "hour"
jantung:jantung N1 ; ! "heart"
jari:jari N1 ; ! "finger"
kaki:kaki N1 ; ! "foot"
kasih:kasih N1 ; ! "love"
keju:keju N1 ; ! "cheese"
keluarga:keluarga N1 ; ! "family"
kepala:kepala N1 ; ! "head"
kepala:kepala N1 ; ! "head"
kereta:kereta N1 ; ! "car"
kerja:kerja N1 ; ! "work"
kopi:kopi N1 ; ! "coffee"
kota:kota N1 ; ! "city"
laki:laki N1 ; ! "husband"
leher:leher N1 ; ! "neck"
lekaki:lekaki N1 ; ! "man"
lengan:lengan N1 ; ! "arm"
lidah:lidah N1 ; ! "tongue"
lutut:lutut N1 ; ! "knee"
malam:malam N1 ; ! "night"
manusia:manusia N1 ; ! "human"
masalah:masalah N1 ; ! "problem"
mata:mata N1 ; ! "eye"
menit:menit N1 ; ! "minute"
mentega:mentega N1 ; ! "butter"
muka:muka N1 ; ! "face"
mulut:mulut N1 ; ! "mouth"
nama:nama N1 ; ! "name"
orang:orang N1 ; ! "person"
oren:oren N1 ; ! "orange"
pagi:pagi N1 ; ! "morning"
paha:paha N1 ; ! "thigh"
perut:perut N1 ; ! "stomach"
pikir:pikir N1 ; ! "thought"
pintu:pintu N1 ; ! "door"
pisang:pisang N1 ; ! "banana"
pria:pria N1 ; ! "man"
raja:raja N1 ; ! "king"
raja:raja N1 ; ! "king"
rambut:rambut N1 ; ! "hair"
roti:roti N1 ; ! "bread"
rumah:rumah N1 ; ! "home"
saat:saat N1 ; ! "moment"
sarapan:sarapan N1 ; ! "breakfast"
sebentar:sebentar N1 ; ! "moment"
sekolah:sekolah N1 ; ! "school"
senjata:senjata N1 ; ! "weapon"
seseorang:seseorang N1 ; ! "someone"
siang:siang N1 ; ! "daytime"
sifat:sifat N1 ; ! "characteristic"
siku:siku N1 ; ! "elbow"
susu:susu N1 ; ! "milk"
tahun:tahun N1 ; ! "year"
tahun:tahun N1 ; ! "year"
tekak:tekak N1 ; ! "throat"
telinga:telinga N1 ; ! "ear"
teman:teman N1 ; ! "friend"
tempat:tempat N1 ; ! "place"
tengan:tengan N1 ; ! "hand"
tunjuk:tunjuk N1 ; ! "point"
waktu:waktu N1 ; ! "time"
wang:wang N1 ; ! "money"
wanita:wanita N1 ; ! "woman"


!=============!
 LEXICON Verbs
!=============!

ada:ada V ; ! "be"
adakah:adakah V ; ! "do"
bawa:bawa V ; ! "bring"
beritahu:beritahu V ; ! "tell"
berpikir:berpikir V ; ! "think"
bertemu:bertemu V ; ! "meet"
biarkan:biarkan V ; ! "let"
bicara:bicara V ; ! "speak"
dengar:dengar V ; ! "hear"
ingin:ingin V ; ! "want"
kakatan:kakatan V ; ! "say"
kasih:kasih V ; ! "love"
keluar:keluar V ; ! "exit"
kembali:kembali V ; ! "return"
mahu:mahu V ; ! "want"
makan:makan V ; ! "eat"
membawa:membawa V ; ! "lead"
membuat:membuat V ; ! "make"
membunuh:membunuh V ; ! "kill"
memiliki:memiliki V ; ! "own"
mencari:mencari V ; ! "search"
mengambil:mengambil V ; ! "take"
merasa:merasa V ; ! "feel"
percaya:percaya V ; ! "believe"
rasa:rasa V ; ! "taste"
sendiri:sendiri V ; ! "own"
tahu:tahu V ; ! "know"
takut:takut V ; ! "fear"
terima:terima V ; ! "receive"
tidur:tidur V ; ! "sleep"


!==================!
 LEXICON Adjectives
!==================!

bahagian:bahagian ADJ ; ! "part"
baik:baik ADJ ; ! "good"
banyak:banyak ADJ ; ! "many"
beberapa:beberapa ADJ ; ! "few"
beberapa:beberapa ADJ ; ! "some"
berat:berat ADJ ; ! "heavy"
berkuasa:berkuasa ADJ ; ! "powerful"
bersih:bersih ADJ ; ! "clean"
besar:besar ADJ ; ! "big"
betul:betul ADJ ; ! "correct"
biru:biru ADJ ; ! "blue"
bundar:bundar ADJ ; ! "circular"
buruk:buruk ADJ ; ! "bad"
coklat:coklat ADJ ; ! "brown"
dalam:dalam ADJ ; ! "deep"
gelap:gelap ADJ ; ! "dark"
hijau:hijau ADJ ; ! "green"
hitam:hitam ADJ ; ! "black"
jingga:jingga ADJ ; ! "orange"
kecil:kecil ADJ ; ! "small"
kelabu:kelabu ADJ ; ! "gray"
kering:kering ADJ ; ! "dry"
kosong:kosong ADJ ; ! "empty"
kotor:kotor ADJ ; ! "dirty"
kuning:kuning ADJ ; ! "yellow"
lebar:lebar ADJ ; ! "wide"
lebar:lebar ADJ ; ! "wide"
lemah:lemah ADJ ; ! "weak"
lurus:lurus ADJ ; ! "straight"
mahal:mahal ADJ ; ! "expensive"
manis:manis ADJ ; ! "sour"
masam:masam ADJ ; ! "sour"
masin:masin ADJ ; ! "salty"
merah:merah ADJ ; ! "red"
muda:muda ADJ ; ! "young"
murah:murah ADJ ; ! "inexpensive"
nipis:nipis ADJ ; ! "thin"
pahit:pahit ADJ ; ! "bitter"
panjang:panjang ADJ ; ! "long"
pendek:pendek ADJ ; ! "short"
perlahan:perlahan ADJ ; ! "slow"
putih:putih ADJ ; ! "white"
salah:salah ADJ ; ! "wrong"
sedikit:sedikit ADJ ; ! "little"
segar:segar ADJ ; ! "fresh"
sempit:sempit ADJ ; ! "narrow"
semua:semua ADJ ; ! "whole"
senyap:senyap ADJ ; ! "quiet"
sukar:sukar ADJ ; ! "difficult"
tebal:tebal ADJ ; ! "thick"
tinggi:tinggi ADJ ; ! "tall"
tua:tua ADJ ; ! "old"
ungu:ungu ADJ ; ! "purple"

!===================!
 LEXICON Prepositions
!===================!

atas:atas PR ; ! "over"
berhampiran:berhampiran PR ; ! "near"
dari:dari PR ; ! "from"
dari:dari PR ; ! "of"
di:di PR ; ! "at"
kecuali:kecuali PR ; ! "except"
luar:luar PR ; ! "beyond"
oleh:oleh PR ; ! "by"
pada:pada PR ; ! "on"
sebagai:sebagai PR ; ! "as"
sebelum:sebelum PR ; ! "before"
selama:selama PR ; ! "during"
selpas:selpas PR ; ! "after"
seterusnya:seterusnya PR ; ! "next"
setiap:setiap PR ; ! "per"
tentang:tentang PR ; ! "about"
terhadap:terhadap PR ; ! "against"
tetapi:tetapi PR ; ! "but"
untuk:untuk PR ; ! "for"
walaupun:walaupun PR ; ! "despite"



! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! http://www.cis.upenn.edu/~cis639/docs/lexc.html
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
